Hawaii, session 2026, HB560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that access to justice is a cornerstone of a fair and equitable society.  However, many Hawaii residents face significant barriers in navigating the legal system.  Vulnerable populations, including low-income individuals, families in crisis, and persons with behavioral health needs, are particularly impacted by a lack of resources. The legislature further finds that community-based organizations play a vital role in delivering essential services that strengthen access to justice, including legal aid, mediation, case management, and behavioral interventions. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to provide increased funding for the judiciary for services contracted with community-based organizations that deliver essential services, streamline judicial processes, and support the judiciary's capacity to effectively meet the needs of vulnerable households. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for services contracted with community-based organizations that deliver essential services, streamline judicial processes, and support the judiciary's capacity to effectively meet the needs of vulnerable households. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the judiciary for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________